Utah statutes.
20A-12-304 (Superseded 01/01/11).   Judicial retention election candidates
-- Financial reporting requirements -- Year-end summary report.
(1)  The judge's personal campaign committee shall file a summary report with
the lieutenant governor by January 10 of the year after the regular general
election year.
(2) (a)  Each summary report shall include the following information as of
December 31 of the last regular general election year:
(i)  a single figure equal to the total amount of contributions reported on
the interim report;
(ii)  a single figure equal to the total amount of expenditures reported on
the interim report;
(iii)  a detailed listing of each contribution received since the last summary
report that has not been reported in detail on the interim report;
(iv)  for each nonmonetary contribution, the fair market value of the
contribution;
(v)  a detailed listing of each expenditure made since the last summary report
that has not been reported in detail on the interim report;
(vi)  for each nonmonetary expenditure, the fair market value of the
expenditure; and
(vii)  the net balance for the year, consisting of all contributions minus all
expenditures.
(b) (i)  For all single contributions of $50 or less, an aggregate figure may
be reported without a separate detailed listing.
(ii)  Two or more contributions from the same source for a total of more than
$50 may not be reported in the aggregate, but shall be reported in the
detailed listing.
(3)  The summary report shall contain a statement signed by the judge
certifying that, to the best of the judge's knowledge, all contributions and
all expenditures have been reported as of December 31 of the last regular
general election year and that there are no financial obligations outstanding
except as set forth in the report.
